Utah statutes.
7-1-316.   Forms for reports required from institutions.

The commissioner shall prescribe the forms for all reports required by law or regulation from financial institutions subject to the jurisdiction of the department and may change the forms at his discretion. The department shall furnish without charge upon the request of any such institution any blank form necessary or required by law.

